District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.02a

Legal private holidays.

A legal private holiday is a day on which any paid family, vacation, personal, compensatory, leave bank or unpaid leave that has been provided by the employer may be granted pursuant to subchapter XII of this chapter and Chapter 12 of Title 32 and includes the District of Columbia Emancipation Day, April 16th of each year.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1202a
as added Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-237, § 3(b), 48 DCR 597
Resolution 14-409, the “Council Emancipation Day Delegation Emergency Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective April 19, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3(b) of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-20, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2699).